createYaml/yaml_output/VTA_IND_N.yaml
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: nimiinigonaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: gimiinigosiinaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: gimiinigonaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Pl: gimiinigoosiim
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Pl: gimiinigoom
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Sg: gimiinigoosiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Sg: gimiinigoo
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: nimiinaasiwaanaanig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: nimiinaanaanig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimiinimaasiwaanaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimiinimaanaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: nimiinaasiwaanaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: nimiinaanaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: gimiinaasiwaanaanig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: gimiinaanaanig
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimiinimaasiwaanaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimiinimaanaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: gimiinaasiwaanaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: gimiinaanaan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+1Sg: nimiinigoosiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+1Sg: nimiinigoo
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+2Pl: gimiinigoosiim
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+2Pl: gimiinigoom
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+2Sg: gimiinigoosiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+2Sg: gimiinigoo
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3PlProx: miinaasiiwag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3PlProx: miinaawag
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiiwan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaawan
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3SgProx: miinaasiin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3SgProx: miinaa
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+Excl: nimiinigoosiimin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+Excl: nimiinigoomin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+Incl: gimiinigoosiimin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+Incl: gimiinigoomin
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+1Sg: nimiinigosiinaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+1Sg: nimiinigonaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+2Pl: gimiinigosiinaawaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+2Pl: gimiinigonaawaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+2Sg: gimiinigosiinaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+2Sg: gimiinigonaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+3PlProx: omiinigosiinaawaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+3PlProx: omiinigonaawaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinigosiininaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinigoninaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+3SgProx: omiinigosiinaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+3SgProx: omiinigonaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+Excl: nimiinigosiiminaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+Excl: nimiinigominaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+Incl: gimiinigosiiminaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+Incl: gimiinigominaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+1Sg: nimiinigosiinaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+1Sg: nimiinigonaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+2Pl: gimiinigosiinaawaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+2Pl: gimiinigonaawaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+2Sg: gimiinigosiinaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+2Sg: gimiinigonaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3PlProx: omiinigosiinaawaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3PlProx: omiinigonaawaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinigosiininaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinigoninaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3SgProx: omiinigosiinaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3SgProx: omiinigonaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+Excl: nimiinigosiiminaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+Excl: nimiinigominaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+Incl: gimiinigosiiminaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+Incl: gimiinigominaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: gimiinisinooninimwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: gimiinininimwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: gimiinisinooninaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: gimiinininaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: nimiinaasiibaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: nimiinaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimiinimaasiibanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimiinimaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: nimiinaasiiban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: nimiinaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: gimiizhi1siimwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: gimiizhi1mwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: gimiinaasiwaawaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: gimiinaawaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimiinimaasiwaawaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimiinimaawaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: gimiinaasiwaawaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: gimiinaawaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+Excl: gimiizhi1siiminaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+Excl: gimiizhi1minaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: gimiizhi1siinaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: gimiizhi1naaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: gimiinaasiibaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: gimiinaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimiinimaasiibanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimiinimaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: gimiinaasiiban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: gimiinaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+Excl: gimiizhi1siiminaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+Excl: gimiizhi1minaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: nimiinigosiibaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: nimiinigobaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: gimiinigosiiwaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: gimiinigowaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: gimiinigosiibaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: gimiinigobaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinaasiwaawaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinaawaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: nimiinigonaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: nimiinigosiinaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: gimiinigosiinaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: gimiinigonaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: omiinigosiiwaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: omiinigowaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: omiinigosiibanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: omiinigobanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: nimiinigosiiban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: nimiinigoban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: gimiinigosiiwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: gimiinigowaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: gimiinigosiiban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: gimiinigoban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinaasiibanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: omiinaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: nimiinigosiinaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: nimiinigonaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: gimiinigosiinaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: gimiinigonaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Pl: gimiinigoosiimwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Pl: gimiinigoomwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Sg: gimiinigoosiinaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Sg: gimiinigoonaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: nimiinaasiwaanaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: nimiinaanaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimiinimaasiwaanaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: nimiinimaanaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: nimiinaasiwaanaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: nimiinaanaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: gimiinaasiwaanaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: gimiinaanaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimiinimaasiwaanaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: gimiinimaanaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: gimiinaasiwaanaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: gimiinaanaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+1Sg: nimiinigoosiinaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+1Sg: nimiinigoonaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+2Pl: gimiinigoosiimwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+2Pl: gimiinigoomwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+2Sg: gimiinigoosiinaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+2Sg: gimiinigoonaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3PlProx: miinaasiibaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3PlProx: miinaabaneg
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaasiibanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: miinimaabanen
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3SgProx: miinaasiiban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3SgProx: miinaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+Excl: nimiinigoosiiminaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+Excl: nimiinigoominaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+Incl: gimiinigoosiiminaaban
     miizh+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+Incl: gimiinigoominaaban
